Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 3 General Obligation and Construction of
Contract

11-2-301.
General obligations of parties.

The obligation of the seller is to transfer and deliver and that of the buyer is to accept and pay in accordance with the contract.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—301, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-302.
Unconscionable contract or clause.

If the court as a matter of law finds the contract or any clause of the contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the contract, or it may enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

When it is claimed or appears to the court that the contract or any clause thereof may be unconscionable the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—302, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Section not intended merely to relieve party from bad bargain. —

If court determines as a matter of law that provision of a contract is unconscionable when made, it may, among other things, so limit the application of any unconscionable provision to avoid an unconscionable result, but O.C.G.A. §11-2-302 is not designed merely to relieve a party of a bad bargain. Romine, Inc. v. Savannah Steel Co., 117 Ga. App. 353, 160 S.E.2d 659 (1968).

11-2-303.
Allocation or division of risks.

Where this article allocates a risk or a burden as between the parties “unless otherwise agreed,” the agreement may not only shift the allocation but may also divide the risk or burden.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2 — 303, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-304.
Price payable in money, goods, realty, or otherwise.

The price can be made payable in money or otherwise. If it is payable in whole or in part in goods each party is a seller of the goods which he is to transfer.

Even though all or part of the price is payable in an interest in realty the transfer of the goods and the seller’s obligations with reference to them are subject to this article, but not the transfer of the interest in realty or the transferor’s obligations in connection therewith.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—304, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-305.
Open price term.

The parties if they so intend can conclude a contract for sale even though the price is not settled. In such a case the price is a reasonable price at the time for delivery if:

Nothing is said as to price; or

The price is left to be agreed by the parties and they fail to agree; or

The price is to be fixed in terms of some agreed market or other standard as set or recorded by a third person or agency and it is not so set or recorded.

A price to be fixed by the seller or by the buyer means a price for him to fix in good faith.

When a price left to be fixed otherwise than by agreement of the parties fails to be fixed through fault of one party the other may at his option treat the contract as canceled or himself fix a reasonable price.

Where, however, the parties intend not to be bound unless the price be fixed or agreed and it is not fixed or agreed there is no contract. In such a case the buyer must return any goods already received or if unable so to do must pay their reasonable value at the time of delivery and the seller must return any portion of the price paid on account.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—305, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 11.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “canceled” for “cancelled” in subsection (3).

11-2-306.
Output, requirements, and exclusive dealings.

A term which measures the quantity by the output of the seller or the requirements of the buyer means such actual output or requirements as may occur in good faith, except that no quantity unreasonably disproportionate to any stated estimate or in the absence of a stated estimate to any normal or otherwise comparable prior output or requirements may be tendered or demanded.

A lawful agreement by either the seller or the buyer for exclusive dealing in the kind of goods concerned imposes unless otherwise agreed an obligation by the seller to use best efforts to supply the goods and by the buyer to use best efforts to promote their sale.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—306, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-307.
Delivery in single lot or several lots.

Unless otherwise agreed all goods called for by a contract for sale must be tendered in a single delivery and payment is due only on such tender but where the circumstances give either party the right to make or demand delivery in lots the price if it can be apportioned may be demanded for each lot.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—307, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-308.
Absence of specified place for delivery.

Unless otherwise agreed:

The place for delivery of goods is the seller’s place of business or if he has none his residence; but

In a contract for sale of identified goods which to the knowledge of the parties at the time of contracting are in some other place, that place is the place for their delivery; and

Documents of title may be delivered through customary banking channels.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—308, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-309.
Absence of specific time provisions; notice of termination.

The time for shipment or delivery or any other action under a contract if not provided in this article or agreed upon shall be a reasonable time.

Where the contract provides for successive performances but is indefinite in duration it is valid for a reasonable time but unless otherwise agreed may be terminated at any time by either party.

Termination of a contract by one party except on the happening of an agreed event requires that reasonable notification be received by the other party and an agreement dispensing with notification is invalid if its operation would be unconscionable.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—309, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-310.
Open time for payment or running of credit; authority to ship under reservation.

Unless otherwise agreed:

Payment is due at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive the goods even though the place of shipment is the place of delivery; and

If the seller is authorized to send the goods he or she may ship them under reservation, and may tender the documents of title, but the buyer may inspect the goods after their arrival before payment is due unless such inspection is inconsistent with the terms of the contract (Code Section 11-2-513); and

If delivery is authorized and made by way of documents of title otherwise than by subsection (b) of this Code section then payment is due regardless of where the goods are to be received (i) at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive delivery of the tangible documents or (ii) at the time the buyer is to receive delivery of the electronic documents and at the seller’s place of business or if none, the seller’s residence; and

Where the seller is required or authorized to ship the goods on credit the credit period runs from the time of shipment but post-dating the invoice or delaying its dispatch will correspondingly delay the starting of the credit period.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—310, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 481, § 2-4/HB 451.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 27, 2010, inserted “or she” near the beginning of paragraph (b); in paragraph (c), inserted “regardless of where the goods are to be received (i)” and substituted “delivery of the tangible documents or (ii) at the time the buyer is to receive delivery of the electronic documents and at the seller’s place of business or if none, the seller’s residence” for “the documents regardless of where the goods are to be received” near the end; and substituted “post-dating” for “postdating” in the middle of paragraph (d). See the Editor’s notes for applicability.

11-2-311.
Options and cooperation respecting performance.

An agreement for sale which is otherwise sufficiently definite (subsection (3) of Code Section 11-2-204) to be a contract is not made invalid by the fact that it leaves particulars of performance to be specified by one of the parties. Any such specification must be made in good faith and within limits set by commercial reasonableness.

Unless otherwise agreed specifications relating to assortment of goods are at the buyer’s option and except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(c) and (3) of Code Section 11-2-319 specifications or arrangements relating to shipment are at the seller’s option.

Where such specification would materially affect the other party’s performance but is not seasonably made or where one party’s cooperation is necessary to the agreed performance of the other but is not seasonably forthcoming, the other party in addition to all other remedies:

Is excused for any resulting delay in his own performance; and

May also either proceed to perform in any reasonable manner or after the time for a material part of his own performance treat the failure to specify or to cooperate as a breach by failure to deliver or accept the goods.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—311, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-312.
Warranty of title and against infringement; buyer’s obligation against infringement.

Subject to subsection (2) of this Code section there is in a contract for sale a warranty by the seller that:

The title conveyed shall be good, and its transfer rightful; and

The goods shall be delivered free from any security interest or other lien or encumbrance of which the buyer at the time of contracting has no knowledge.

A warranty under subsection (1) of this Code section will be excluded or modified only by specific language or by circumstances which give the buyer reason to know that the person selling does not claim title in himself or that he is purporting to sell only such right or title as he or a third person may have.

Unless otherwise agreed a seller who is a merchant regularly dealing in goods of the kind warrants that the goods shall be delivered free of the rightful claim of any third person by way of infringement or the like but a buyer who furnishes specifications to the seller must hold the seller harmless against any such claim which arises out of compliance with the specifications.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—312, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-313.
Express warranties by affirmation, promise, description, sample.

Express warranties by the seller are created as follows:

Any affirmation of fact or promise made by the seller to the buyer which relates to the goods and becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the affirmation or promise.

Any description of the goods which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the description.

Any sample or model which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the whole of the goods shall conform to the sample or model.

It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that the seller use formal words such as “warrant” or “guarantee” or that he have a specific intention to make a warranty, but an affirmation merely of the value of the goods or a statement purporting to be merely the seller’s opinion or commendation of the goods does not create a warranty.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—313, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-314.
Implied warranty: merchantability; usage of trade.

Unless excluded or modified (Code Section 11-2-316), a warranty that the goods shall be merchantable is implied in a contract for their sale if the seller is a merchant with respect to goods of that kind. Under this Code section the serving for value of food or drink to be consumed either on the premises or elsewhere is a sale.

Goods to be merchantable must be at least such as:

Pass without objection in the trade under the contract description; and

In the case of fungible goods, are of fair average quality within the description; and

Are fit for the ordinary purposes for which such goods are used; and

Run, within the variations permitted by the agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity within each unit and among all units involved; and

Are adequately contained, packaged, and labeled as the agreement may require; and

Conform to the promises or affirmations of fact made on the container or label if any.

Unless excluded or modified (Code Section 11-2-316) other implied warranties may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—314, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Parties may expressly broaden or narrow warranty. —

Parties may expressly agree on provisions of contract and extent of warranty, which may be more limited or more extensive than implied warranty of law. Jones v. Knightstown Body Co., 52 Ga. App. 667, 184 S.E. 427 (1936) (decided under former Code 1933, § 96-301).

Vendor may act in good faith in transaction, and yet violate O.C.G.A. §11-2-314.

A.D.L. Sales Co. v. Gailey, 48 Ga. App. 798, 173 S.E. 734 (1934) (decided under former Code 1910, § 4135).

Section applicable to sales and not leases. —

It would appear from a literal reading of O.C.G.A. §11-2-314 that it was intended to apply only to “sales” and not leases. Redfern Meats, Inc. v. Hertz Corp., 134 Ga. App. 381, 215 S.E.2d 10 (1975).

11-2-315.
Implied warranty: fitness for particular purpose.

Where the seller at the time of contracting has reason to know any particular purpose for which the goods are required and that the buyer is relying on the seller’s skill or judgment to select or furnish suitable goods, there is unless excluded or modified under Code Section 11-2-316 an implied warranty that the goods shall be fit for such purpose.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—315, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Parties may expand or limit warranty. —

Parties may expressly agree on provisions of contract and extent of warranty, which may be more limited or more extensive than implied warranty of law. Jones v. Knightstown Body Co., 52 Ga. App. 667, 184 S.E. 427 (1936).

11-2-316.
Exclusion or modification of warranties.

Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to negate or limit warranty shall be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other; but subject to the provisions of this article on parol or extrinsic evidence (Code Section 11-2-202) negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that such construction is unreasonable.

Subject to subsection (3) of this Code section, to exclude or modify the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must mention merchantability and in case of a writing must be conspicuous, and to exclude or modify any implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a writing and conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it states, for example, that “There are no warranties which extend beyond the description on the face hereof.”

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this Code section:

Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties are excluded by expressions like “as is,” “with all faults,” or other language which in common understanding calls the buyer’s attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty; and

When the buyer before entering into the contract has examined the goods or the sample or model as fully as he desired or has refused to examine the goods there is no implied warranty with regard to defects which an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed to him; and

An implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course of dealing or course of performance or usage of trade; and

With respect to the sale of cattle, hogs, and sheep by a licensed auction company or by an agent, there shall be no implied warranty by said auction company or agent that the cattle, hogs, and sheep are free from disease; provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph shall not be applicable to brucellosis reactor cattle detected at an official state laboratory within 30 days following the date of sale.

Remedies for breach of warranty can be limited in accordance with the provisions of this article on liquidation or limitation of damages and on contractual modification of remedy (Code Sections 11-2-718 and 11-2-719).

The implied warranty of merchantability under Code Section 11-2-314 and the implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose under Code Section 11-2-315 shall not be applicable to the procurement, processing, storage, distribution, or use of whole human blood, blood plasma, blood products, blood derivatives, or other human tissue or organs for the purpose of injecting, transfusing, incorporating, or transplanting any of them into the human body. The injection, transfusion, or other transfer of blood, blood plasma, blood products, or blood derivatives and the transplanting or other transfer of any tissue, bones, or organs into or unto the human body shall not be considered, for the purpose of this article, commodities subject to sale or barter, but shall be considered as medical services.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—316, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 457, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 756, § 1.

Section does not govern limitation of remedies. —

The provisions of O.C.G.A. §11-2-316 have no bearing on the seller’s ability to achieve the less comprehensive legal effect of limiting the remedies which are available to the buyer for breach of implied warranties. It is the separate provisions of O.C.G.A. §§11-2-718 or11-2-719 which govern the limitation of remedies. Apex Supply Co. v. Benbow Indus., Inc., 189 Ga. App. 598, 376 S.E.2d 694 (1988).

11-2-317.
Cumulation and conflict of warranties express or implied.

Warranties whether express or implied shall be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if such construction is unreasonable the intention of the parties shall determine which warranty is dominant. In ascertaining that intention the following rules apply:

Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or model or general language of description.

A sample from an existing bulk displaces inconsistent general language of description.

Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties other than an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—317, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-318.
Third party beneficiaries of warranties express or implied.

A seller’s warranty whether express or implied extends to any natural person who is in the family or household of his buyer or who is a guest in his home if it is reasonable to expect that such person may use, consume, or be affected by the goods and who is injured in person by breach of the warranty. A seller may not exclude or limit the operation of this Code section.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—318, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

Section does not limit members of family covered to those living within buyer’s household. —

In O.C.G.A. §11-2-318, the words “family or household” do not, because stated in the alternative, limit members of family who may rely on implied warranty to those who live within household of buyer. Chastain v. Fuqua Indus., Inc., 156 Ga. App. 719, 275 S.E.2d 679 (1980).

11-2-319.
F.O.B. and F.A.S. terms.

Unless otherwise agreed the term F.O.B. (which means “free on board”) at a named place, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which:

When the term is F.O.B. the place of shipment, the seller must at that place ship the goods in the manner provided in this article (Code Section 11-2-504) and bear the expense and risk of putting them into the possession of the carrier; or

When the term is F.O.B. the place of destination, the seller must at his own expense and risk transport the goods to that place and there tender delivery of them in the manner provided in this article (Code Section 11-2-503);

When under either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection the term is also F.O.B. vessel, car, or other vehicle, the seller must in addition at his own expense and risk load the goods on board. If the term is F.O.B. vessel the buyer must name the vessel and in an appropriate case the seller must comply with the provisions of this article on the form of bill of lading (Code Section 11-2-323).

Unless otherwise agreed the term F.A.S. vessel (which means “free alongside”) at a named port, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which the seller must:

At his own expense and risk deliver the goods alongside the vessel in the manner usual in that port or on a dock designated and provided by the buyer; and

Obtain and tender a receipt for the goods in exchange for which the carrier is under a duty to issue a bill of lading.

Unless otherwise agreed in any case falling within subsection (1)(a) or (c) or subsection (2) of this Code section the buyer must seasonably give any needed instructions for making delivery, including when the term is F.A.S. or F.O.B. the loading berth of the vessel and in an appropriate case its name and sailing date. The seller may treat the failure of needed instructions as a failure of cooperation under this article (Code Section 11-2-311). He may also at his option move the goods in any reasonable manner preparatory to delivery or shipment.

Under the term F.O.B. vessel or F.A.S. unless otherwise agreed the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—319, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-320.
C.I.F. and C. & F. terms.

The term C.I.F. means that the price includes in a lump sum the cost of the goods and the insurance and freight to the named destination. The term C. & F. or C.F. means that the price so includes cost and freight to the named destination.

Unless otherwise agreed and even though used only in connection with the stated price and destination, the term C.I.F. destination or its equivalent requires the seller at his own expense and risk to:

Put the goods into the possession of a carrier at the port for shipment and obtain a negotiable bill or bills of lading covering the entire transportation to the named destination; and

Load the goods and obtain a receipt from the carrier (which may be contained in the bill of lading) showing that the freight has been paid or provided for; and

Obtain a policy or certificate of insurance, including any war risk insurance, of a kind and on terms then current at the port of shipment in the usual amount, in the currency of the contract, shown to cover the same goods covered by the bill of lading and providing for payment of loss to the order of the buyer or for the account of whom it may concern; but the seller may add to the price the amount of the premium for any such war risk insurance; and

Prepare an invoice of the goods and procure any other documents required to effect shipment or to comply with the contract; and

Forward and tender with commercial promptness all the documents in due form and with any indorsement necessary to perfect the buyer’s rights.

Unless otherwise agreed the term C. & F. or its equivalent has the same effect and imposes upon the seller the same obligations and risks as a C.I.F. term except the obligation as to insurance.

Under the term C.I.F. or C. & F. unless otherwise agreed the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—320, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-321.
C.I.F. or C. & F.: “net landed weights”; “payment on arrival”; warranty of condition on arrival.

Under a contract containing a term C.I.F. or C. & F.:

Where the price is based on or is to be adjusted according to “net landed weights,” “delivered weights,” “out turn” quantity or quality, or the like, unless otherwise agreed the seller must reasonably estimate the price. The payment due on tender of the documents called for by the contract is the amount so estimated, but after final adjustment of the price a settlement must be made with commercial promptness.

An agreement described in subsection (1) of this Code section or any warranty of quality or condition of the goods on arrival places upon the seller the risk of ordinary deterioration, shrinkage, and the like in transportation but has no effect on the place or time of identification to the contract for sale or delivery or on the passing of the risk of loss.

Unless otherwise agreed where the contract provides for payment on or after arrival of the goods the seller must before payment allow such preliminary inspection as is feasible; but if the goods are lost delivery of the documents and payment are due when the goods should have arrived.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—321, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-322.
Delivery “ex-ship.”

Unless otherwise agreed a term for delivery of goods “ex-ship” (which means from the carrying vessel) or in equivalent language is not restricted to a particular ship and requires delivery from a ship which has reached a place at the named port of destination where goods of the kind are usually discharged.

Under such a term unless otherwise agreed:

The seller must discharge all liens arising out of the carriage and furnish the buyer with a direction which puts the carrier under a duty to deliver the goods; and

The risk of loss does not pass to the buyer until the goods leave the ship’s tackle or are otherwise properly unloaded.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—322, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-323.
Form of bill of lading required in overseas shipment; “overseas.”

Where the contract contemplates overseas shipment and contains a term C.I.F. or C. & F. or F.O.B. vessel, the seller unless otherwise agreed shall obtain a negotiable bill of lading stating that the goods have been loaded in board or, in the case of a term C.I.F. or C. & F., received for shipment.

Where in a case within subsection (1) of this Code section a tangible bill of lading has been issued in a set of parts, unless otherwise agreed if the documents are not to be sent from abroad the buyer may demand tender of the full set; otherwise only one part of the bill of lading need be tendered. Even if the agreement expressly requires a full set:

Due tender of a single part is acceptable within the provisions of this article on cure of improper delivery (subsection (1) of Code Section 11-2-508); and

Even though the full set is demanded, if the documents are sent from abroad the person tendering an incomplete set may nevertheless require payment upon furnishing an indemnity which the buyer in good faith deems adequate.

A shipment by water or by air or a contract contemplating such shipment is “overseas” insofar as by usage of trade or agreement it is subject to the commercial, financing, or shipping practices characteristic of international deep water commerce.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—323, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 481, § 2-5/HB 451.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 27, 2010, in subsection (1), substituted “shall” for “must” and substituted “in board” for “on board”; and inserted “tangible” near the beginning of subsection (2). See the Editor’s notes for applicability.

11-2-324.
“No arrival, no sale” term.

Under a term “no arrival, no sale” or terms of like meaning, unless otherwise agreed:

The seller must properly ship conforming goods and if they arrive by any means he must tender them on arrival but he assumes no obligation that the goods will arrive unless he has caused the nonarrival; and

Where without fault of the seller the goods are in part lost or have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract or arrive after the contract time, the buyer may proceed as if there had been casualty to identified goods (Code Section 11-2-613).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—324, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-325.
“Letter of credit” term; “confirmed credit.”

Failure of the buyer seasonably to furnish an agreed letter of credit is a breach of the contract for sale.

The delivery to seller of a proper letter of credit suspends the buyer’s obligation to pay. If the letter of credit is dishonored, the seller may on seasonable notification to the buyer require payment directly from him.

Unless otherwise agreed the term “letter of credit” or “banker’s credit” in a contract for sale means an irrevocable credit issued by a financing agency of good repute and, where the shipment is overseas, of good international repute. The term “confirmed credit” means that the credit must also carry the direct obligation of such an agency which does business in the seller’s financial market.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—325, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-326.
Sale on approval and sale or return; rights of creditors.

Unless otherwise agreed, if delivered goods may be returned by the buyer even though they conform to the contract, the transaction is:

A “sale on approval” if the goods are delivered primarily for use; and

A “sale or return” if the goods are delivered primarily for resale.

Goods held on approval are not subject to the claims of the buyer’s creditors until acceptance; goods held on sale or return are subject to such claims while in the buyer’s possession.

Any “or return” term of a contract for sale is to be treated as a separate contract for sale within the statute of frauds section of this article (Code Section 11-2-201) and as contradicting the sale aspect of the contract within the provisions of this article on parol or extrinsic evidence (Code Section 11-2-202).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—326, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 6.

The 2001 amendment,

effective July 1, 2001, deleted “consignment sales and” in the catchline, substituted “Goods” for “Except as provided in subsection (3) of this Code section, goods” at the beginning of subsection (2), deleted subsection (3), which read: “Where goods are delivered to a person for sale and such person maintains a place of business at which he deals in goods of the kind involved, under a name other than the name of the person making delivery, then with respect to claims of creditors of the person conducting the business the goods are deemed to be on sale or return. The provisions of this subsection are applicable even though an agreement purports to reserve title to the person making delivery until payment or resale or uses such words as ‘on consignment’ or ‘on memorandum.’ However, this subsection is not applicable if the person making delivery: (a) Complies with an applicable law providing for a consignor’s interest or the like to be evidenced by a sign; or (b) Establishes that the person conducting the business is generally known by his creditors to be substantially engaged in selling the goods of others; or (c) Complies with the filing provisions of the article on secured transactions (Article 9 of this title).”, and redesignated former subsection (4) as present subsection (3).

11-2-327.
Special incidents of sale on approval and sale or return.

Under a sale on approval unless otherwise agreed:

Although the goods are identified to the contract the risk of loss and the title do not pass to the buyer until acceptance; and

Use of the goods consistent with the purpose of trial is not acceptance but failure seasonably to notify the seller of election to return the goods is acceptance, and if the goods conform to the contract acceptance of any part is acceptance of the whole; and

After due notification of election to return, the return is at the seller’s risk and expense but a merchant buyer must follow any reasonable instructions.

Under a sale or return unless otherwise agreed:

The option to return extends to the whole or any commercial unit of the goods while in substantially their original condition, but must be exercised seasonably; and

The return is at the buyer’s risk and expense.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—327, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1.

11-2-328.
Sale by auction.

In a sale by auction if goods are put up in lots each lot is the subject of a separate sale.

A sale by auction is complete when the auctioneer so announces by the fall of the hammer or in other customary manner. Where a bid is made while the hammer is falling in acceptance of a prior bid the auctioneer may in his discretion reopen the bidding or declare the goods sold under the bid on which the hammer was falling. In sales by auction the auctioneer shall be considered agent of both parties so far as to dispense with any further memorandum in writing than his own entries.

Such a sale is with reserve unless the goods are in explicit terms put up without reserve. In an auction with reserve the auctioneer may withdraw the goods at any time until he announces completion of the sale. In an auction without reserve, after the auctioneer calls for bids on an article or lot, that article or lot cannot be withdrawn unless no bid is made within a reasonable time. In either case a bidder may retract his bid until the auctioneer’s announcement of completion of the sale, but a bidder’s retraction does not revive any previous bid.

If the auctioneer knowingly receives a bid on the seller’s behalf or the seller makes or procures such a bid, and notice has not been given that liberty for such bidding is reserved, the buyer may at his option avoid the sale or take the goods at the price of the last good faith bid prior to the completion of the sale. This subsection shall not apply to any bid at a forced sale.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-2—328, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1101, § 1.